Tennessee, session 114, HB1275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 2, Part 7, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
By July 31, 2025, and by each July 31 thereafter, the department shall list on its
website each LEA designated as a high performing school district for the upcoming
school year and how long the LEA will be designated a high performing school district
before having to meet the criteria for re-designation pursuant to this part.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1275
003027
- 1 -